Georgia, session 2025_26, HB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to the authority granted by Code Section 36-7-2.1 of the O.C.G.A., the office of
elected county surveyor of Gilmer County is hereby abolished. The governing authority of
Gilmer County shall appoint a qualified person to hold the office of county surveyor for a
term of one year from the date of appointment. Successors shall also be appointed for terms
of one year. Any person appointed county surveyor shall possess the qualifications specified
by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 36-7-2 of the O.C.G.A. Any person
elected and serving as the county surveyor of Gilmer County on the effective date of this Act
H. B. 448
- 1 -

LC 58 0007/AP
shall continue to serve as such until the expiration of the current term to which such person
was elected, and no further elections shall be held for such office.
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 448
- 2 -